Utah statutes.
10-5-127.   Signing of checks -- Determination of sufficiency of account.

The town treasurer, or in his absence a deputy treasurer appointed by the council, shall sign all checks prepared by the town clerk. Prior to affixing the signature, the treasurer or deputy treasurer shall determine that a sufficient amount is on deposit in the appropriate bank account of the town to honor the check. The council may also designate any town officer to countersign checks.



Enacted by Chapter 34, 1983 General Session

